Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-727
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish criteria of eligibility for inclusion in the Nebraska Hall of Fame and to establish standards for the creation, design, size, configuration, and placement of busts or other appropriate objects.

Laws 1961, c. 355, § 4, p. 1119;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 5.